District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1707

Recoveries for wrongful distraints.

Repealed.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 675, ch. 690, title I, § 7
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 18(f), 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1707.
1973 Ed., § 47-1407.

Prior Codifications

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”

Editor's Notes